Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-305.01
Psychiatric services; administration.

Psychiatric services under the control of the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall be under the jurisdiction of the Chancellor of the University of Nebraska Medical Center, who shall report to the Board of Regents through the President of the University of Nebraska. The chancellor or his or her designee shall be responsible for the administration and preparation of the psychiatric services budget and shall have the same powers, authority, and duties as prescribed for the chief executive officers of the state hospitals described in section 83-305.

Laws 1953, c. 345, § 4, p. 1122;

Laws 1975, LB 466, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 112, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 130.

The transfer of control of the Nebraska Psychiatric Institute from the Department of Public Institutions did not impliedly repeal county liability under section 83-376 for patients treated at the Nebraska Psychiatric Institute. County of Douglas v. Board of Regents, 210 Neb. 573, 316 N.W.2d 62 (1982).